Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.433

Information technology investment revolving account.

(1) The information technology investment revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from legislative appropriations and transfers must be deposited into the account. Only the director of financial management or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) Any residual balance of funds remaining in the information technology investment revolving account created in section 705, chapter 4, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. and reenacted in subsection (1) of this section shall be transferred to the information technology investment revolving account created in subsection (1) of this section after June 30, 2017.

[ 2018 c 299 s 901; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 950.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 299: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 27, 2018]." [ 2018 c 299 s 927.]

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.